src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
añámos/XxV5V6 st:añar
cayéis/V9V0 st:cayer
caéis/V9V0 st:caer
dai/V9Ys
dais/V9 st:dar
das/V7 st:dar
di/V3V7 st:dar st:dicir
diéndo/V1V2V7V8 st:dir
diéndo/V1V2V7V8 st:haber
dái/XxV0 st:dar
dáis/XxV0 st:dar
dámos/XxV5V6 st:dar
dás/XxV8 st:dar
déas/XxV7V8 st:dar
dí/XxV4V8Ys st:dar st:dicir
facéis/V9V0 st:facer
facémos/XxV5V6 st:facer
fuémos/XxV5V6 st:dir
fuémos/XxV5V6 st:ser
fuérais/XxV9V0 st:dir
fuérais/XxV9V0 st:ser
fuéramos/V5V6 st:dir
fuéramos/V5V6 st:ser
fuéras/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuéras/XxV7V8 st:ser
fuéreis/XxV9V0 st:dir
fuéreis/XxV9V0 st:ser
fuéremos/V5V6 st:dir
fuéremos/V5V6 st:ser
fuéres/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuéres/XxV7V8 st:ser
fuésti/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuésti/XxV7V8 st:ser
fuéstis/XxV9V0 st:dir
fuéstis/XxV9V0 st:ser
fuímos/XxV5V6 st:dir
fuímos/XxV5V6 st:ser
fuísti/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuísti/XxV7V8 st:ser
fuístis/XxV9V0 st:dir
fuístis/XxV9V0 st:ser
fáes/XxV7V8 st:facer
fómos/XxV5V6 st:dir
fómos/XxV5V6 st:ser
fórais/XxV9V0 st:dir
fórais/XxV9V0 st:ser
fóramos/V5V6 st:dir
fóramos/V5V6 st:ser
fóras/XxV7V8 st:dir
fóras/XxV7V8 st:ser
fóreis/XxV9V0 st:dir
fóreis/XxV9V0 st:ser
fóremos/V5V6 st:dir
fóremos/V5V6 st:ser
fóres/XxV7V8 st:dir
fóres/XxV7V8 st:ser
fósti/XxV7V8 st:dir
fósti/XxV7V8 st:ser
fóstis/XxV9V0 st:dir
fóstis/XxV9V0 st:ser
habéis/V9V0 st:haber
habémos/XxV5V6 st:haber
has/V7 st:haber 
hás/XxV8 st:haber
hémos/XxV5V6 st:haber
odiáis/V9V0 st:odiar
odiámos/XxV5V6 st:odiar
oísti/V7V8 st:oyer
oístis/V9V0 st:oyer
queréis/V9V0 st:querer
querémos/XxV5V6 st:querer
quies/V7 st:querer
quiés/XxV8 st:querer
rayéis/V9V0 st:rayer
raéis/V9V0 st:raer
ris/V7 st:rir
ris/V9 st:rir
risti/V7 st:rir
riáis/V9V0 st:rir
riámos/XxV5V6 st:rir
riémos/XxV5V6 st:rir
riérais/XxV9V0 st:rir
riéramos/V5V6 st:rir
riéras/XxV7V8 st:rir
riéreis/XxV9V0 st:rir
riéremos/V5V6 st:rir
riéres/XxV7V8 st:rir
riésti/XxV7V8 st:rir
riéstis/XxV9V0 st:rir
rías/V7V8 st:rir
rímos/XxV5V6 st:rir
rís/XxV0 st:rir
rís/XxV8 st:rir
rísti/XxV8 st:rir
rístis/XxV9V0 st:rir
siéndo/V1V2V7V8 st:ser
sois/V9 st:ser
sío/V1V2V7V8 st:ser 
sóis/XxV0 st:ser
sómos/XxV5V6 st:ser
tais/V9 st:tar
tao/V1V2V7V8 st:tar 
tas/V7 st:tar
ten/V7Ys st:tener
trayéis/V9V0 st:trayer
traéis/V9V0 st:traer
táis/XxV0 st:tar
támos/XxV5V6 st:tar
tándo/V1V2V7V8 st:tar
tás/XxV8 st:tar
tén/XxV8 st:tener
vais/V9 st:dir
vas/V7 st:dir
vei/LlV9 st:ver
veis/LlV9 st:ver
ves/LlV7 st:ver
veámos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
viémos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
viérais/LlXxV9V0 st:ver
viéramos/LlV5V6 st:ver
viéras/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
viéreis/LlXxV9V0 st:ver
viéremos/LlV5V6 st:ver
viéres/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
viésti/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
viéstis/LlXxV9V0 st:ver
váis/XxV0 st:dir
vámos/XxV5V6 st:dir
vás/XxV8 st:dir
véas/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
véi/LlXxV0 st:ver
véis/LlXxV0 st:ver
vémos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
vímos/LlXxV5V6 st:ver
vísti/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
vístis/LlXxV9V0 st:ver
yes/V7 st:ser
yés/XxV8 st:ser
ábras/XxV7V8 st:abrir
ábres/XxV7V8 st:abrir
áidas/XxV7V8 st:aidar
áides/XxV7V8 st:aidar
álces/XxV7V8Ys st:alzar
álzas/XxV7V8Ys st:alzar
átes/XxV7V8Ys st:atar
áñas/XxV7V8 st:añar
áñes/XxV7V8 st:añar
éches/XxV7V8 st:echar
éntras/XxV7V8Ys st:entrar
éntres/XxV7V8Ys st:entrar
ódias/XxV7V8 st:odiar
ódies/XxV7V8 st:odiar
óigas/XxV7V8 st:oyer
óis/XxV8 st:oyer
óis/XxV8 st:oyer
óyas/XxV7V8Ys st:oyer
óyes/XxV7V8Ys st:oyer
úfras/XxV7V8Ys st:ufrir
úfres/XxV7V8Ys st:ufrir
únvias/XxV7V8 st:unviar
únvies/XxV7V8/ st:unviar
úsas/XxV7V8 st:usar
úses/XxV7V8 st:usar
